District of Columbia statutes.
47-1074

Theatre Downtown, Inc.; lot 26, square 406.

The portion of real property located at lot 26, square 406 and leased to the Theatre Downtown, Inc., is hereby exempt from real property taxation so long as it is leased to the Theatre Downtown, Inc., and used for the purpose of producing and staging live theatre performances; provided, that the benefit of this exemption shall be passed on to the Theatre Downtown, Inc.

Sept. 29, 2006, D.C. Law 16-172, § 2(b), 53 DCR 6432

Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-172, as amended by D.C. Law 17-219, § 7081, provided:

“Sec. 3. Applicability; conditional effect.

“(a) Section 2 shall apply as of the date of execution of the lease for the real property by Theatre Downtown, Inc.

“(b) Repealed.

“(c) Repealed.”

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1072(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1072(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1072(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).